District of Columbia statutes.
6-701.08

Violations of part.

Any person failing or neglecting to provide fire escapes, guide signs, guide lights, exit lights, hall and stairway lights, standpipes, fire extinguishers, alarm gongs, and striking stations, or other appliances required by this part, after notice from the Mayor of the District of Columbia so to do, shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than $10 nor more than $100 and shall be punished by a further fine of $5 for each day that he fails to comply with such notice. Any person violating any other provision of this part or regulations promulgated hereunder shall be punished, upon conviction thereof, by a fine of not less than $10 nor more than $100 for each offense.

Mar. 19, 1906, 34 Stat. 71, ch. 957, § 8
June 4, 1934, 48 Stat. 845, ch. 388
1981 Ed., § 5-508.
1973 Ed., § 5-308.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.